Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.800

Procedural amendments—Zoning ordinance.

An amendment to the text of a zoning ordinance which does not impose, remove or modify any regulation theretofore existing and affecting the zoning status of land shall be processed in the same manner prescribed by this chapter for the adoption of an official control except that no public hearing shall be required either by the commission or the board.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.800. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 80.]